Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1848
Authority; journal; public records.

All final actions of the authority shall be recorded in a journal, and the journal and all instruments and documents relating thereto shall be kept on file at the office of the authority and shall be open to the inspection of the public at all reasonable times.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 48.